Washington statutes.
RCW 9.96.010

Restoration of civil rights.

Whenever the governor shall grant a pardon to a person convicted of an infamous crime, or whenever the maximum term of imprisonment for which any such person was committed is about to expire or has expired, and such person has not otherwise had his or her civil rights restored, the governor shall have the power, in his or her discretion, to restore to such person his or her civil rights in the manner as in this chapter provided.

[ 2011 c 336 s 342; 1961 c 187 s 2; 1931 c 19 s 1; 1929 c 26 s 2; RRS s 10250.]